Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3391.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 4 O.S. 2021, Section 30.7, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 30.7. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and
Forestry may deny a license, or renewal thereof, or revoke a license
of any applicant, animal shelter operator, or commercial pet breeder
who fails to meet the standards of animal care, fails to display a
commercial pet breeder license number as required by Section 30.10
of this title, or fails to follow the application process adopted by
the Department, or if the person:
1. Is convicted of a crime involving animal cruelty;
2. Is convicted of violating the Commercial Pet Breeders and
Animal Shelter Licensing Act more than three times;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3391 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. Is convicted of a type of felony specified by subparagraphs
a through pp aaa of paragraph 2 of Section 571 of Title 57 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
4. Is convicted of a felony punishable under the Oklahoma
Racketeer-Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act; or
5. Has held or applied for a United States Department of
Agriculture license pursuant to the Animal Welfare Act and whose
license was suspended or revoked, or whose application was refused
due to the improper care of animals.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 4 O.S. 2021, Section 30.10, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 30.10. A. An animal shelter operator and commercial
pet breeder shall prominently display a copy of the animal shelter
license or commercial pet breeder license at the facility of the
animal shelter or commercial pet breeder. A commercial pet breeder
shall include the commercial pet breeder license number in each
advertisement for the sale or transfer of an animal by the
commercial pet breeder. A commercial pet breeder shall include in
each contract for the sale or transfer of an animal by the
commercial pet breeder the commercial pet breeder license number.
B. As used in this section, “advertisement” means any attempt
by a person or entity to induce the purchase, sale, trade, or
transfer of a pet by a commercial pet breeder through the use of a

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3391 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

noti ce or announcement. An advertisement shall include, but not be
limited to, any communication disseminated through the following:
1. Visual or audio communications such as radio, television,
film, streaming services, or any other broadcast or recorded format;
2. Printed materials such as newspapers, magazines, flyers,
brochures, billboards, business cards, or other physical
publications; and
3. Digital and electronic communications such as websites,
social media platforms, mobile applications, electronic mail, text
messages, digital display boards, and any other internet-based or
electronic communication systems.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AGRICULTURE AND WILDLIFE
April 13, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS











SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3391 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)